Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 433.321 is amended to read:
433.321. (1) In all Oregon hospitals and birthing centers  where more than 200 live births occur
per year, each newborn child must receive  a newborn hearing screening test. A hospital or birthing
center shall attempt  to conduct the test required under this subsection prior to the discharge of the
newborn child from the facility.
(2) All Oregon hospitals and birthing centers  where fewer than 200 live births occur per year
shall provide  the parent or guardian of a newborn child with the appropriate information furnished
by the Oregon Health Authority concerning the importance of newborn hearing screening tests.
(3) All Oregon hospitals and birthing centers conducting newborn hearing  screening tests,
within 10 days of conducting a newborn hearing screening test, shall:
(a) Notify the  parent or guardian and the health care provider of the newborn child of the test
results;
(b) Provide the parent or guardian with  names and contact information for diagnostic facilities
that conduct newborn hearing screening tests in the community and with materials developed pur-
suant to ORS 433.298; and
(c) Report to the authority the results of the test for the newborn child  and information identi-
fying the newborn child.
(4) A diagnostic facility conducting newborn  hearing screening tests, within 10 days of con-
ducting a newborn  hearing screening test, shall report to the authority the results of the test for
the newborn child and information identifying the newborn child. If a  diagnostic facility conducting
newborn hearing screening tests  detects hearing loss in a newborn child, the diagnostic facility shall
provide to the parent or guardian materials developed pursuant to ORS 433.298.
(5) Each public and private educational institution that provides early intervention services  as
defined in  ORS 343.035 shall disclose to the authority information identifying the children referred
to the educational institution with  diagnosed hearing loss and the enrollment status of the children.
The institution may disclose to the authority additional information regarding children with hearing
loss who are receiving  early intervention services if the educational institution has obtained consent
to disclose the information.
Enrolled House Bill 2685 (HB 2685-A) Page 1
(6) The authority[ , in collaboration with  the Child Development and Rehabilitation Center of the
Oregon Health and Science University, ] shall, on an annual basis,  provide to all Oregon hospitals and
birthing centers the following information:
(a) A description of the responsibilities created by this section;
(b) A list  of appropriate screening devices and descriptions of training protocols to ensure that
staff members are adequately trained in the use of hearing screening equipment;
(c) A list of diagnostic facilities that conduct newborn hearing screening tests;
(d) Using  evidence-based best practice standards, a recommended schedule for conducting new-
born hearing screening tests[ , and for referring parents and  guardians to health care providers for the
purpose of diagnosing whether the newborn child  has congenital cytomegalovirus, within 21 days of the
newborn child’s date of birth ];
(e) An expanded targeted screening protocol to identify newborns that  should receive
testing for cytomegalovirus within 14 days of  birth and prior to discharge from the hospital
or birthing center;
(f) A recommended protocol  for infant and early childhood diagnostic testing and care
following a positive screening result for cytomegalovirus;
[(e)] (g)  A list  of public and private educational institutions that provide early intervention
services and a description of the geographic area served by each institution; and
[(f)] (h)  Other information related to newborn  hearing screening tests  or cytomegalovirus  that
the authority deems appropriate.
(7)(a) If a newborn has  a positive screening result for cytomegalovirus, the hospital or
birthing center shall notify the parent or guardian and the health  care provider of the new-
born.
(b) A health benefit  plan, as defined in ORS 743B.005, shall provide payment, coverage
or reimbursement for the cost of cytomegalovirus testing conducted  in accordance with the
expanded targeted screening protocol adopted by the authority under this section.
(c) The authority shall adopt rules to establish the expanded targeted  screening protocol
for cytomegalovirus described in this section based on symptoms that could  be attributed to
cytomegalovirus, using evidence-based best practices and standards.
(8)(a) Except as provided  in paragraph (b) or (c) of this subsection, all hospitals and
birthing centers shall comply with the screening protocol established by the department un-
der subsection (7) of this section.
(b) A hospital or birthing  center is exempt from conducting newborn screening for
cytomegalovirus under this section if the parent  or guardian of the newborn objects to the
testing in writing.
(c) A  hospital or birthing center in a health maintenance organization, as defined in ORS
750.005, shall conduct newborn screening for  cytomegalovirus under this section within 14
days of birth.
[(7)] (9)  A hospital or birthing center described  in subsection (1) of this section is exempt from
providing newborn hearing screening tests if the parent or guardian of the newborn  child objects
to the testing procedure on the  grounds that the procedure conflicts with the religious tenets and
practices of the parent or guardian. The parent or guardian must sign a statement  that the newborn
child is being reared in accordance with those religious tenets and practices.
[(8)] (10) A newborn child may  not be refused the procedure described in subsection (1) of this
section because of an inability of the parent or guardian to pay for the procedure.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 433.321, as amended by section 1 of this 2025 Act, is amended to read:
433.321. (1) In all Oregon hospitals and birthing centers  where more than 200 live births occur
per year, each newborn child must receive  a newborn hearing screening test. A hospital or birthing
center shall attempt  to conduct the test required under this subsection prior to the discharge of the
newborn child from the facility.
Enrolled House Bill 2685 (HB 2685-A) Page 2
(2) All Oregon hospitals and birthing centers  where fewer than 200 live births occur per year
shall provide  the parent or guardian of a newborn child with the appropriate information furnished
by the Oregon Health Authority concerning the importance of newborn hearing screening tests.
(3) All Oregon  hospitals and birthing centers conducting newborn hearing screening tests,
within 10 days of conducting a newborn hearing screening test, shall:
(a) Notify the parent or guardian and the health care provider of the newborn child of  the test
results;
(b) Provide the parent or guardian with names  and contact information for diagnostic facilities
that conduct newborn hearing screening tests in the community and with materials developed pur-
suant to ORS 433.298; and
(c) Report to the  authority the results of the test for the newborn child and information identi-
fying the newborn child.
(4) A diagnostic facility conducting newborn hearing screening tests,  within 10 days of con-
ducting a newborn hearing screening test, shall report to the authority the results of the  test for
the newborn child and information identifying the newborn child. If a  diagnostic facility conducting
newborn hearing screening tests  detects hearing loss in a newborn child, the diagnostic facility shall
provide to the parent or guardian materials developed pursuant to ORS 433.298.
(5) Each  public and private educational institution that provides early intervention services as
defined in ORS 343.035 shall disclose to the authority information identifying the children  referred
to the educational institution with  diagnosed hearing loss and the enrollment status of the children.
The institution may disclose to the authority additional information regarding children with hearing
loss who are receiving  early intervention services if the educational institution has obtained consent
to disclose the information.
(6) The authority shall, on an  annual basis, provide to all Oregon hospitals and birthing centers
the following information:
(a) A description of the responsibilities created by this section;
(b) A list of appropriate screening devices and descriptions of training protocols to  ensure that
staff members are adequately trained in the use of hearing screening equipment;
(c) A list of diagnostic facilities that conduct newborn hearing screening tests;
(d) Using evidence-based best practice standards, a recommended schedule for conducting  new-
born hearing screening tests;
[(e) An  expanded targeted screening protocol to identify newborns that should receive testing for
cytomegalovirus within 14 days of birth and prior to discharge from the hospital or birthing center; ]
[(f)] (e)  A recommended protocol for infant  and early childhood diagnostic testing and care fol-
lowing a positive screening result for cytomegalovirus;
[(g)] (f)  A list of public and private educational institutions that provide early intervention ser-
vices and a description of the geographic area served by each institution; and
[(h)] (g)  Other information related to newborn hearing screening tests or cytomegalovirus that
the authority deems appropriate.
[(7)(a) If a newborn has a  positive screening result for cytomegalovirus, the hospital or birthing
center shall notify the parent or guardian and the health care provider of the newborn. ]
[(b) A health benefit plan, as defined in ORS 743B.005, shall  provide payment, coverage or re-
imbursement for the cost of cytomegalovirus testing conducted in accordance with the expanded targeted
screening protocol adopted by the authority under this section. ]
[(c) The authority shall  adopt rules to establish the expanded targeted screening protocol for
cytomegalovirus described in this section based on  symptoms that could be attributed to
cytomegalovirus, using evidence-based best practices and standards. ]
[(8)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) or (c) of this  subsection, all hospitals and birthing
centers shall comply with the screening protocol established by the  department under subsection (7) of
this section. ]
[(b) A hospital or birthing  center is exempt from conducting newborn screening for cytomegalovirus
under this section if the parent or guardian of the newborn objects to the testing in writing. ]
Enrolled House Bill 2685 (HB 2685-A) Page 3
[(c) A hospital or birthing center in a health maintenance organization,  as defined in ORS 750.005,
shall conduct newborn screening for cytomegalovirus under this section within 14 days of birth. ]
[(9)] (7)  A hospital or birthing center described  in subsection (1) of this section is exempt from
providing newborn hearing screening tests if the parent or guardian of the newborn  child objects
to the testing procedure on the  grounds that the procedure conflicts with the religious tenets and
practices of the parent or guardian. The parent or guardian must sign a statement  that the newborn
child is being reared in accordance with those religious tenets and practices.
[(10)] (8) A newborn child may  not be refused the procedure described in subsection (1) of this
section because of an inability of the parent or guardian to pay for the procedure.
SECTION 3. The amendments to ORS 433.321 by section  2 of this 2025 Act become oper-
ative on the date the Oregon Health Authority adds cytomegalovirus to the  newborn
bloodspot screening panel.
SECTION 4.  ORS 433.298 is amended to read:
433.298. (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall compile information on the following:
(a) The transmission of congenital cytomegalovirus  and methods to reduce the  risk of in-
fection during pregnancy;
(b) The signs and symptoms of and methods of diagnosing congenital cytomegalovirus;
(c) The potential complications associated with congenital cytomegalovirus; and
(d) Treating and managing congenital cytomegalovirus.
[(2) The  authority shall disseminate the information described in subsection (1) of this section to
hospitals, birthing centers, diagnostic facilities  that conduct newborn hearing screening tests, health
care providers and the public. The authority must disseminate  the information through print publica-
tions. The authority  also may disseminate the information through electronic publications, video pro-
ductions or any other method determined to be cost-effective by the authority. ]
(2)(a) The authority shall disseminate the information described in  subsection (1) of this
section to:
(A) Hospitals.
(B) Birthing centers.
(C) Diagnostic facilities that conduct newborn hearing screening tests.
(D) Prenatal health care providers, including gynecologists and obstetricians.
(E) The Department of Early Learning and Care.
(F) The public.
(b) The department  shall disseminate the information to all certified or registered child
care facilities, as defined in ORS 329A.263, for the facilities to educate employees about  the
risk of contracting cytomegalovirus during pregnancy.
(c) Except as provided in paragraph (d) of this  subsection, the information disseminated
under this section may be  disseminated by print publication, electronic publication, video
publication or any other cost-effective method.
(d) Hospitals, birthing centers, diagnostic facilities that conduct newborn  hearing
screening tests and prenatal health care  providers shall at a minimum provide information
to patients in print publications under this section no later than 48 hours after birth.
SECTION 5.
No later than  January 1, 2026, the Oregon Health Authority shall establish
by rule the expanded targeted screening protocol for cytomegalovirus  described in ORS
433.321 (7)(c), as amended by section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 6. Section 5 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 7. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 2685 (HB 2685-A) Page 4
Passed by House June 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 24, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2685 (HB 2685-A) Page 5